Utah statutes.
63H-3-109 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Relation to certain acts.

(1)  The authority is exempt from:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 63A, Chapter 1, Department of Administrative Services;

(c)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(d)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(e)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(2)  The authority is subject to audit by:

(a)  the state auditor pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 3, Auditor; and

(b)  the legislative auditor general pursuant to Section 36-12-15.

(3)  The authority shall annually report to the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee created under Section 63E-1-201 concerning the authority's implementation of this part.

